Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7295.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Well testing for private or public wells in the town of Tiverton.
(a)(1) In the town of Tiverton, prior to the commencement of any proposed construction of
low- or moderate-income housing, the town may require testing to be performed by and at the
expense of the proposed developer or builder to establish whether any existing or newly proposed
private or public wells shall be adversely affected to include, but not be limited to, dewatering or
loss of effective recharge.
(2) The test results shall be submitted to the town engineer with a copy to the department
of public works.
(3) Any adverse consequences identified pursuant to the testing completed pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be eliminated or mitigated at the sole expense
of the proposed developer or builder to the extent necessary to prevent serious harm or loss of water
service to existing wells. The town engineer and/or other town personnel appointed by the town
council shall approve the proposal submitted by the developer or builder to eliminate or mitigate
the adverse consequence in accordance with the requirements of this subsection. All costs related
to elimination or mitigation of the adverse consequences shall be the responsibility of the developer
or builder.
(b) The testing shall comply with all regulations issued by the department of environmental

management and the department of health.
(c) The department of environmental management may promulgate rules and regulations
to implement the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004161
========
LC004161 - Page 2 of 3